test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-joorbas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - luäǯǯ class A1a: # Adjective 'loose' - full paradigm
    luäǯǯ+A+Sg+Nom: luäǯǯ
    luäǯǯ+A+Pl+Nom: luäǯǯ
    luäǯǯ+A+Attr: luäǯǯas
    luäǯǯ+A+Comp+Attr: luäǯǯab
    luäǯǯ+A+Superl+Attr: luäǯǯmõs

  Adjective - čueʹǩǩ class A1e: # Adjective 'shallow' - full paradigm
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Sg+Nom: čueʹǩǩ
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Pl+Nom: čueʹjj
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Attr: čueʹjjes
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Comp+Attr: čueʹjjab
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Superl+Attr: čueʹjjmõs

  Adjective - kuʹǩǩ class A1e: # Adjective 'long' - full paradigm
    kuʹǩǩ+A+Sg+Nom: kuʹǩǩ
    kuʹǩǩ+A+Pl+Nom: kuuʹǩǩ
    kuʹǩǩ+A+Attr: kuʹǩes
    kuʹǩǩ+A+Comp+Attr: kuuʹǩǩab
    kuʹǩǩ+A+Superl+Attr: kuuʹǩǩmõs

  Adjective - neuʹrr class A1e: # Adjective 'bad' - full paradigm
    neuʹrr+A+Sg+Nom: neuʹrr
    neuʹrr+A+Pl+Nom: neeuʹr
    neuʹrr+A+Attr: neeuʹres
    neuʹrr+A+Comp+Attr: neeuʹrab
    neuʹrr+A+Superl+Attr: neeuʹrmõs

  Adjective - čââvas class A4a: # Adjective 'durable' - full paradigm
    čââvas+A+Sg+Nom: čââvas
#    čââvas+A+Pl+Nom: čââvas
    čââvas+A+Attr: čââpp
    čââvas+A+Comp+Attr: čââppsab
    čââvas+A+Superl+Attr: čââppsumus

  Adjective - kõõumâs class A4â: # Adjective 'hard' - full paradigm
    kõõumâs+A+Sg+Nom: kõõumâs
    kõõumâs+A++Pl+Nom: kõummâz
    kõõumâs+A+Attr: kõumm
    kõõumâs+A+Comp+Attr: kõummsab
    kõõumâs+A+Superl+Attr: kõummsumus
    
  Adjective - jõõskâs class A4â: # Adjective 'quiet' - full paradigm
    jõõskâs+A+Sg+Nom: jõõskâs
    jõõskâs+A+Pl+Nom: jõskkâz
    jõõskâs+A+Attr: jõskk
    jõõskâs+A+Comp+Attr: jõskksab
    jõõskâs+A+Superl+Attr: jõskksumus

  Adjective - joorbâs class A4â: # Adjective 'round' - full paradigm
    joorbâs+A+Sg+Nom: joorbâs
    joorbâs+A+Pl+Nom: jorbbâz
    joorbâs+A+Attr: jorbb

  Adjective - tiiudâs class A4â: # Adjective 'full' - full paradigm
    tiiudâs+A+Sg+Nom: tiiudâs
    tiiudâs+A+Attr: tiudd

  Adjective - vuäʹmes class A4e: # Adjective 'old' - full paradigm
    vuäʹmes+A+Sg+Nom: vuäʹmes
    vuäʹmes+A+Pl+Nom: vuämmaz
    vuäʹmes+A+Attr: vuäʹmm
    vuäʹmes+A+Comp+Attr: vuämmsab
    vuäʹmes+A+Superl+Attr: vuämmsumus
